Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.040

Terms fixed by board—Minimums for certain cases.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The board shall fix the duration of confinement for persons committed by the court before July 1, 1986, for crimes committed before July 1, 1984. Within six months after the admission of the convicted person to a state correctional facility, the board shall fix the duration of confinement. The term of imprisonment so fixed shall not exceed the maximum provided by law for the offense of which the person was convicted or the maximum fixed by the court where the law does not provide for a maximum term.

Subject to RCW 9.95.047, the following limitations are placed on the board or the court for persons committed to a state correctional facility on or after July 1, 1986, for crimes committed before July 1, 1984, with regard to fixing the duration of confinement in certain cases, notwithstanding any provisions of law specifying a lesser sentence:

(1) For a person not previously convicted of a felony but armed with a deadly weapon at the time of the commission of the offense, the duration of confinement shall not be fixed at less than five years.

(2) For a person previously convicted of a felony either in this state or elsewhere and who was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of the commission of the offense, the duration of confinement shall not be fixed at less than seven and one-half years.

The words "deadly weapon," as used in this section include, but are not limited to, any instrument known as a blackjack, sling shot, billy, sand club, sandbag, metal knuckles, any dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other firearm, any knife having a blade longer than three inches, any razor with an unguarded blade, any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club, any explosive, and any weapon containing poisonous or injurious gas.

(3) For a person convicted of being an habitual criminal within the meaning of the statute which provides for mandatory life imprisonment for such habitual criminals, the duration of confinement shall not be fixed at less than fifteen years.

(4) Any person convicted of embezzling funds from any institution of public deposit of which the person was an officer or stockholder, the duration of confinement shall be fixed at not less than five years.

Except when an inmate of a state correctional facility has been convicted of murder in the first or second degree, the board may parole an inmate prior to the expiration of a mandatory minimum term, provided such inmate has demonstrated a meritorious effort in rehabilitation and at least two-thirds of the board members concur in such action: PROVIDED, That any inmate who has a mandatory minimum term and is paroled prior to the expiration of such term according to the provisions of this chapter shall not receive a conditional release from supervision while on parole until after the mandatory minimum term has expired.

An inmate serving a sentence fixed under this chapter, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the secretary of corrections when authorized under *RCW 9.94A.728(4).

[1999 c 324 s 4. Prior: 1993 c 144 s 4; 1993 c 140 s 1; 1992 c 7 s 24; 1986 c 224 s 9; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 63 s 2; 1961 c 138 s 2; 1955 c 133 s 5; prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.94A.728 was amended by 2009 c 455 s 2, changing subsection (4) to subsection (3). RCW 9.94A.728 was subsequently amended by 2015 c 156 s 1, changing subsection (3) to subsection (1)(c).

Effective date—1993 c 144: See note following RCW 9.95.045.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.